Nebraska, session 109, LB541.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 32-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-101 Sections 32-101 to 32-1552 and sections 3 and 30 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Election Act.
Sec. 2. Section 32-103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-103 For purposes of the Election Act, the definitions found in
sections 32-104 to 32-120 and 32-123 and section 3 of this act shall be
used.
Sec. 3. Hand count means to conduct a count or recount of ballots
by hand as required by section 30 of this act, without the assistance of
any electronic device or equipment, including, but not limited to,
scanners. This definition shall not be construed to exclude the use of
desktop or handheld calculators or adding machines.
Sec. 4. Section 32-202, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-202 In addition to any other duties prescribed by law, the
Secretary of State shall:
(1) Supervise the conduct of primary and general elections in this
state;
(2) Provide training and support for election commissioners, county
clerks, and other election officials in providing for day-to-day
operations of the office, registration of voters, and the conduct of
elections;
(3) Enforce the Election Act;
(4) With the assistance and advice of the Attorney General, make
uniform interpretations of the act;
(5) Provide periodic training for the agencies and their agents and
contractors in carrying out their duties under sections 32-308 and to
32-310;
(6) Develop and print forms for use as required by sections 32-308,
-2-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
32-310, 32-320, 32-329, 32-947, 32-956, and 32-958;
(7) Contract with the Department of Administrative Services for
storage and distribution of the forms;
(8) Require reporting to ensure compliance with sections 32-308 and
to 32-310;
(9) Prepare and transmit reports as required by the National Voter
Registration Act of 1993, 52 U.S.C. 20501 et seq.;
(10) Develop and print a manual describing the requirements of the
initiative and referendum process and distribute the manual to election
commissioners and county clerks for distribution to the public upon
request;
(11) Develop and print pamphlets described in section 32-1405.01;
(12) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as necessary for
elections conducted under sections 32-952 to 32-959;
(13) Establish a free access system, such as a toll-free telephone
number or an Internet website, that any voter who casts a provisional
ballot may access to discover whether the vote of that voter was counted
and, if the vote was not counted, the reason that the vote was not
counted. The Secretary of State shall establish and maintain reasonable
procedures necessary to protect the security, confidentiality, and
integrity of personal information collected, stored, or otherwise used by
the free access system. Access to information about an individual
provisional ballot shall be restricted to the individual who cast the
ballot;
(14) Provide a website dedicated to voter identification
requirements and procedures. The Secretary of State shall establish,
maintain, and regularly update on the website a document entitled "List
of Acceptable Forms of Identification" that lists forms of identification
that qualify as valid photographic identification for purposes of voter
identification;
(15) Provide a public awareness campaign regarding the voter
-3-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
identification requirements and procedures, including communication
through multiple mediums and in-person events;
(16) Provide instructions and information to the Department of
Health and Human Services, the Department of Motor Vehicles, and the
State Department of Education for distribution by such agencies to
Nebraska residents regarding the requirement to present valid
photographic identification in order to vote and the way to obtain free
valid photographic identification; and
(17) Not use or allow the use of citizenship information shared with
or collected by the Secretary of State pursuant to the Election Act for
any purpose other than maintenance of the voter registration list,
including law enforcement purposes.
Sec. 5. Section 32-203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-203 In addition to any other powers prescribed by law, the
Secretary of State may:
(1) Inspect, with or without the filing of a complaint by any
person, and review the practices and procedures of election
commissioners, county clerks, their employees, and other election
officials in the day-to-day operations of the office, the conduct of
primary and general elections, and the registration of qualified
electors;
(2) Employ such personnel as necessary to efficiently carry out his
or her powers and duties as prescribed in the Election Act;
(3) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations in regard to the
registration of voters and the conduct of elections, especially regarding
returning ballots by agents under section 32-943 and secure ballot drop-
boxes under section 32-950.01; and
(4) Enforce the act by injunctive action brought by the Attorney
General in the district court for the county in which any violation of
the act occurs.
-4-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
Sec. 6. Section 32-206, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-206 (1) The Secretary of State shall publish an official election
calendar by November 1 prior to the statewide primary election. Such
calendar, to be approved as to form by the Attorney General, shall set
forth the various election deadline dates and other pertinent data as
determined by the Secretary of State. The official election calendar
shall be merely a guideline and shall in no way legally bind the
Secretary of State or the Attorney General.
(2) The Secretary of State shall deliver a copy of the official
election calendar to the state party headquarters of each recognized
political party within ten days after publication under subsection (1) of
this section.
(3) Except as provided in sections 32-302 , 32-304, and 32-306, any
filing or other act required to be performed by a specified day shall be
performed by 5 p.m. of such day, except that if such day falls upon a
Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, performance shall be required on the
next business day.
Sec. 7. Section 32-306, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-306 Deputy registrars shall register voters in teams of at least
two deputies, one of whom is not a member of the same political party as
the other or others. The deputy registrars shall only complete
registration applications for applicants who present valid photographic
identification. The deputy registrars shall return the completed
registration applications to the office of the election commissioner or
county clerk of the county in which the registrations are to be effective
no later than the end of the next business day after the registrations
are taken. The election commissioner or county clerk shall mail an
acknowledgment of registration at least five days prior to the next
election to each person registered by a deputy registrar. Deputy
-5-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
registrars shall not register voters after 6 p.m. on the third Friday
preceding any election. A registration application received after the
deadline shall not be processed by the election commissioner or county
clerk until after the election. This section shall not apply to
registration done by the employees of the election commissioner or county
clerk.
Sec. 8. Section 32-307, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-307 No materials advocating or advertising any political issue,
candidate, or party shall be displayed or distributed within fifty feet
of any voter registration site. No alcohol shall be served within fifty
feet of any voter registration site. The registration procedure shall be
conducted in a neutral manner and shall not be connected with anything
unrelated to the object of registering electors except as otherwise
provided in sections 32-308 and to 32-310.
Sec. 9. Section 32-308, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-308 (1) The Secretary of State and the Director of Motor Vehicles
shall enter into an agreement to match information in the computerized
statewide voter registration list with information in the database of the
Department of Motor Vehicles to the extent required to enable each such
official to verify the accuracy of the information, including
citizenship, provided on applications for voter registration. The
Director of Motor Vehicles shall enter into an agreement with the
Commissioner of Social Security under section 205(r)(8) of the federal
Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 405(r)(8), as such section existed on
April 17, 2003, for purposes of the Election Act.
(2) The Department of Motor Vehicles, with the assistance of the
Secretary of State, shall prescribe a voter registration application
which may be used to register to vote or change an elector's his or her
address for voting purposes at the same time an elector applies for an
-6-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
original or renewal motor vehicle operator's license, an original or
renewal state identification card, or a replacement thereof. The voter
registration application shall contain the information required pursuant
to section 32-312 and shall be designed so that it does not require the
duplication of information in the application for the motor vehicle
operator's license or state identification card, except that it may
require a second signature of the applicant. The department and the
Secretary of State shall make the voter registration application
available to any person applying for an operator's license or state
identification card. The application shall be completed at the office of
the department by the close of business on the third Friday preceding any
election to be registered to vote at such election. A registration
application received after the deadline shall not be processed by the
election commissioner or county clerk until after the election.
(3) The Department of Motor Vehicles, in conjunction with the
Secretary of State, shall develop a process to electronically transmit
voter registration application information received under subsection (2)
of this section to the election commissioner or county clerk of the
county in which the applicant resides within the time limits prescribed
in subsection (4) of this section. The Director of Motor Vehicles shall
designate an implementation date for the process which shall be on or
before January 1, 2016.(4) The voter registration application information
shall be transmitted to the election commissioner or county clerk of the
county in which the applicant resides not later than ten days after
receipt, except that if the voter registration application information is
received within five days prior to the third Friday preceding any
election, it shall be transmitted not later than five days after its
original submission. Any information on whether an applicant registers or
declines to register and the location of the office at which he or she
registers shall be confidential and shall only be used for voter
registration purposes.
-7-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
(4) (5) For each voter registration application for which
information is transmitted electronically pursuant to this section, the
Secretary of State shall obtain a copy of the electronic representation
of the applicant's digital image and signature from the Department of
Motor Vehicles' records of his or her motor vehicle operator's license or
state identification card for purposes of voter registration and voting.
Each voter registration application electronically transmitted under this
section shall include information provided by the applicant that includes
whether the applicant is a citizen of the United States, whether the
applicant is of sufficient age to register to vote, the applicant's
residence address, the applicant's postal address if different from the
residence address, the date of birth of the applicant, the party
affiliation of the applicant or an indication that the applicant is not
affiliated with any political party, the applicant's motor vehicle
operator's license number, the applicant's previous registration location
by city, county, or state, if applicable, and the applicant's signature.
(5) (6) State agency personnel involved in the voter registration
process pursuant to this section and section 32-309 shall not be
considered deputy registrars or agents or employees of the election
commissioner or county clerk.
Sec. 10. Section 32-310, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-310 (1) The State Department of Education and the Department of
Health and Human Services shall provide the opportunity to register to
vote at the time of application, review, or change of address for the
following programs, as applicable: (a) The Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program; (b) the medicaid program; (c) the WIC program as
defined in section 71-2225; (d) the aid to dependent children program;
(e) the vocational rehabilitation program; and (f) any other public
assistance program or program primarily for the purpose of providing
services to persons with disabilities. If the application, review, or
-8-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
change of address is accomplished through an agent or contractor of the
department, the agent or contractor shall provide the opportunity to
register to vote. Any information on whether an applicant registers or
declines to register and the agency at which he or she registers shall be
confidential and shall only be used for voter registration purposes.
(2) The department, agent, or contractor shall make the mail-in
registration application described in section 32-320 available at the
time of application, review, or change of address, and shall provide
assistance, if necessary, to the applicant in completing the application
to register to vote, and shall only accept complete voter registration
applications for applicants who present valid photographic
identification. The department shall retain records indicating whether an
applicant accepted or declined the opportunity to register to vote.
(3) Department personnel, agents, and contractors involved in the
voter registration process pursuant to this section shall not be
considered deputy registrars or agents or employees of the election
commissioner or county clerk.
(4) The applicant may return the completed voter registration
application to the department, agent, or contractor or may personally
mail or deliver the application to the election commissioner or county
clerk as provided in section 32-321. If the applicant returns the
completed application to the department, agent, or contractor, the
department, agent, or contractor shall deliver the application to the
election commissioner or county clerk of the county in which the office
of the department, agent, or contractor is located not later than ten
days after receipt by the department, agent, or contractor, except that
if the application is completed returned to the department, agent, or
contractor within five days prior to the third Friday preceding any
election, it shall be delivered not later than five days after the date
it is returned. The election commissioner or county clerk shall, if
necessary, forward the application to the election commissioner or county
-9-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
clerk of the county in which the applicant resides within such prescribed
time limits. The application shall be completed and returned to the
department, agency, or contractor by the close of business on the third
Friday preceding any election to be registered to vote at such election.
A registration application received after the deadline shall not be
processed by the election commissioner or county clerk until after the
election.
(5) The departments shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to ensure compliance with this section.
Sec. 11. Section 32-311.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-311.01 (1) The Secretary of State shall prescribe and distribute
a registration application which may be used statewide to register to
vote and update voter registration records. An applicant may use the
application to register to vote or to update his or her voter
registration record with changes in his or her personal information or
other information related to his or her eligibility to vote. An applicant
shall may submit the application in person along with valid photographic
identification , through a personal messenger or personal agent, or by
mail. Every election commissioner or county clerk shall accept such an
application for registration. The If an applicant who is eligible to
register to vote submits the application in person at the office of the
election commissioner or county clerk, the information from the
application shall be entered into the voter registration register in the
presence of the applicant if possible.
(2) The application shall contain substantially all the information
provided in section 32-312 and the following informational statements:
(a) An applicant who is unable to sign his or her name may affix his
or her mark next to his or her name written on the signature line by some
other person;
(b) If the application is submitted by mail and the applicant is
-10-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
registering in the state for the first time and has not previously voted
within the state, the applicant must submit with the application a copy
of a photo identification which is current and valid or a copy of a
utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other
government document that is current and that shows the name and address
of the applicant as they appear on the application in order to avoid
additional identification requirements when voting for the first time;
(b) (c) An applicant must may deliver the application to the office
of the election commissioner or county clerk in person and present valid
photographic identification , through a personal messenger or personal
agent, or by mail;
(c) (d) To vote at the polling place on election day, the completed
application must be delivered :(i) Delivered by the applicant in person
to the office of the election commissioner or county clerk on or before
the deadline prescribed in section 32-302; and
(ii) Delivered by the applicant's personal messenger or personal
agent to the office of the election commissioner or county clerk on or
before the third Friday before the election; or
(iii) Postmarked on or before the third Friday before the election
if the application is submitted by mail; and
(d) (e) The election commissioner or county clerk will, upon receipt
of the application for registration, send an acknowledgment of
registration to the applicant indicating whether the application is
proper or not.
Sec. 12. Section 32-312, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-312 The registration application prescribed by the Secretary of
State pursuant to section 32-304 or 32-311.01 shall provide the
instructional statements and request the information from the applicant
as provided in this section.
CITIZENSHIP—"Are you a citizen of the United States of America?"
-11-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
with boxes to check to indicate whether the applicant is or is not a
citizen of the United States.
AGE—"Are you at least eighteen years of age or will you be eighteen
years of age on or before the first Tuesday following the first Monday of
November of this year?" with boxes to check to indicate whether or not
the applicant will be eighteen years of age or older on election day.
WARNING—"If you checked 'no' in response to either of these
questions, do not complete this application.".
NAME—the name of the applicant giving the first and last name in
full, the middle name in full or the middle initial, and the maiden name
of the applicant, if applicable.
RESIDENCE—the name and number of the street, avenue, or other
location of the dwelling where the applicant resides if there is a
number. If the registrant resides in a hotel, apartment, tenement house,
or institution, such additional information shall be included as will
give the exact location of such registrant's place of residence. If the
registrant lives in an incorporated or unincorporated area not identified
by the use of roads, road names, or house numbers, the registrant shall
state the section, township, and range of his or her residence and the
corporate name of the school district as described in section 79-405 in
which he or she is located.
POSTAL ADDRESS—the address at which the applicant receives mail if
different from the residence address.
ADDRESS OF LAST REGISTRATION—the name and number of the street,
avenue, or other location of the dwelling from which the applicant last
registered.
TELEPHONE NUMBERS—the telephone numbers of the applicant. At the
request of the applicant, a designation shall be made that a telephone
number is an unlisted number, and such designation shall preclude the
listing of such telephone number on any list of voter registrations.
EMAIL ADDRESS—an email address of the applicant. At the request of
-12-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
the applicant, a designation shall be made that the email address is
private, and such designation shall preclude the listing of the
applicant's email address on any list of voter registrations.
DRIVER'S LICENSE NUMBER OR LAST FOUR DIGITS OF SOCIAL SECURITY
NUMBER—if the applicant has a Nebraska driver's license, the license
number, and if the applicant does not have a Nebraska driver's license,
the last four digits of the applicant's social security number.
DATE OF APPLICATION FOR REGISTRATION—the month, day, and year when
the applicant presented himself or herself for registration, or when the
applicant completed and signed the registration application if the
application was submitted by mail or delivered to the election official
by the applicant's personal messenger or personal agent, or when the
completed application was submitted if the registration application was
completed pursuant to section 32-304.
PLACE OF BIRTH—show the state, country, kingdom, empire, or dominion
where the applicant was born.
DATE OF BIRTH—show the date of the applicant's birth. The applicant
shall be at least eighteen years of age or attain eighteen years of age
on or before the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November to have
the right to register and vote in any election in the present calendar
year.
REGISTRATION TAKEN BY—show the signature of the authorized official
or staff member accepting the application pursuant to section 32-309 or
32-310 or at least one of the deputy registrars taking the application
pursuant to section 32-306, if applicable.
PARTY AFFILIATION—show the party affiliation of the applicant as
Democratic, Republican, or Other ........ or show no party affiliation as
Nonpartisan. (Note: If you wish to vote in both partisan and nonpartisan
primary elections for state and local offices, you must indicate a
political party affiliation on the registration application. If you
register without a political party affiliation (nonpartisan), you will
-13-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
receive only the nonpartisan ballots for state and local offices at
primary elections. If you register without a political party affiliation,
you may vote in partisan primary elections for congressional offices.)
OTHER—information the Secretary of State determines will assist in
the proper and accurate registration of the voter.
Immediately following the spaces for inserting information as
provided in this section, the following statement shall be printed:
To the best of my knowledge and belief, I declare under penalty of
election falsification that:
(1) I live in the State of Nebraska at the address provided in this
application;
(2) I have not been convicted of a felony or, if convicted, I have
completed my sentence for the felony, including any parole term;
(3) I have not been officially found to be non compos mentis
(mentally incompetent); and
(4) I am a citizen of the United States.
Any registrant who signs this application knowing that any of the
information in the application is false shall be guilty of a Class IV
felony under section 32-1502 of the statutes of Nebraska. The penalty for
a Class IV felony is up to two years imprisonment and twelve months post-
release supervision, a fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both.
APPLICANT'S SIGNATURE—require the applicant to affix his or her
signature to the application.
Sec. 13. Section 32-312.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-312.05 The date that a person's voter registration record or an
update of his or her voter registration record becomes effective is the
date the person presented himself or herself in person to register, the
date the registration application was delivered to the election
commissioner or county clerk, or the date the registration application
was received by the election commissioner or county clerk if the person
-14-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
submitted the registration application by mail or pursuant to section
32-304 or 32-308.
Sec. 14. Section 32-315, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-315 Upon receiving a completed voter registration application
pursuant to section 32-308 , 32-309, or 32-310 indicating that a voter
who is registered in the county has changed his or her name or moved to
another residence within the same county, the election commissioner or
county clerk shall change the voter registration record of the registered
voter to the new name or new address and shall send an acknowledgment
card to the registered voter indicating that the change of registration
has been completed and the address of the voter's new polling place.
Sec. 15. Section 32-320, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-320 The only mail-in forms which may be used to register to vote
shall be the official registration application prescribed by the
Secretary of State or the national mail voter registration application
prescribed by the federal Election Assistance Commission. The Secretary
of State shall provide such official registration applications to all
recruitment offices of the United States Armed Forces in the State of
Nebraska. The counties and state agencies listed in section 32-310 shall
purchase such official registration applications from the Secretary of
State. The Secretary of State shall remit proceeds from the sale of such
applications to the State Treasurer for credit to the Election
Administration Fund.
Sec. 16. Section 32-321, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-321 (1) Any elector may request a voter registration application
from the office of the Secretary of State or the election commissioner or
county clerk. The Secretary of State and the election commissioner or
county clerk shall make registration applications prescribed by the
-15-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
Secretary of State available and may place the applications in public
places. The Secretary of State and the election commissioner or county
clerk may require that all unused applications be returned to his or her
office and may place reasonable limits on the amount of applications
requested.
(2) If an elector returns the completed application to the office of
the Secretary of State or submits an application to the Secretary of
State pursuant to section 32-304, the office shall deliver the
application to the election commissioner or county clerk of the county in
which the elector resides not later than ten days after receipt by the
office, except that if the application is returned to the office or
submitted pursuant to section 32-304 within five days prior to the third
Friday preceding any election, it shall be delivered not later than five
days after the date it is returned. The deadline for returning a
completed application to the office of the Secretary of State or
submitting an application pursuant to section 32-304 is the close of
business on the third Friday preceding an election to be registered to
vote at such election. A registration application received after the
deadline shall not be processed by the election commissioner or county
clerk until after the election. The office of the Secretary of State
shall be a designated voter registration agency for purposes of section 7
of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993, 42 U.S.C. 1973gg-5, as
such section existed on March 11, 2008.
(3) The elector shall also present valid photographic identification
to the election commissioner or county clerk of the county in which the
elector resides. If an elector mails the registration application to the
election commissioner or county clerk:
(a)(i) The application shall be postmarked on or before the third
Friday before the next election; or
(ii) The application shall be received not later than the second
Tuesday before the next election if the postmark is unreadable; and
-16-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
(b) The application shall be processed by the election office as a
proper registration for the voter to be entitled to vote on the day of
the next election.
(4) If the registration application arrives after the registration
deadline, the application shall not be processed until after the
election. Written notice shall be given to any applicant whose
registration application failed to meet the registration deadline or was
found to be incorrect or incomplete and shall state the specific reason
for rejection. If the application is incomplete, the election
commissioner or county clerk shall notify the applicant of the failure to
provide the required information, including failure to provide valid
photographic identification if required, and provide the applicant with
the opportunity to submit an identification document as described in
section 32-318.01 prior to the deadline for voter registration or to
complete and submit a corrected registration application in a timely
manner to allow for the proper registration of the applicant prior to the
next election. All postage costs related to returning registration
applications to the election commissioner or county clerk shall be paid
by the registrant.
Sec. 17. Section 32-323, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-323 Registration pursuant to section 32-304 or 32-308 or by mail
shall not constitute a valid registration for purposes of signing any
type of petition requiring the validation of the signatures of registered
voters until a complete and correct registration application has been
received by the election commissioner or county clerk and the applicant
has presented valid photographic identification. A signature on a
petition shall be considered a valid signature as of the date that the
election commissioner or county clerk receives the registration
application of the registrant and the registrant has presented valid
photographic identification.
-17-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
Sec. 18. Section 32-325, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-325 (1) A registration application completed and signed by a
registered voter seeking to update his or her voter registration record
shall be completed in person at or delivered or mailed to the office of
the election commissioner or county clerk or submitted pursuant to
section 32-304 to the Secretary of State. To avoid additional
requirements at the polling place pursuant to section 32-914.01,
32-914.02, or 32-915, an application to update a voter registration
record must be:
(a) Completed or delivered by the applicant in person at the office
of the election commissioner or county clerk on or before the deadline
prescribed in section 32-302; or
(b) Delivered by a personal messenger or personal agent , submitted
pursuant to section 32-304, or mailed so that it is received by the
election commissioner or county clerk on or before the deadline
prescribed in section 32-321.
(2) After verifying the signature on the previous registration of
the registered voter, the election commissioner or county clerk shall
make the change of name, party affiliation, or address on all pertinent
election records. The election commissioner or county clerk shall send an
acknowledgment card to the registered voter indicating that the change of
registration has been completed and shall include the address of the
registered voter's new polling place.
Sec. 19. Section 32-806, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-806 All official ballots prepared for elections conducted
pursuant to the Election Act shall have a covert watermark that
identifies the ballot as an official Nebraska ballot and shall be white
in color, except that the election commissioner, county clerk, or city or
village clerk may designate a distinctive color of ballot or ink for
-18-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
city, village, or school elections or, when authorized by the Secretary
of State, for elections of any other political subdivision. If a
distinctive color is designated, the color of the ballot shall not be the
same as the sample ballots as provided in section 32-804. The style and
size of type on official ballots shall be as close as possible to the
style used on the ballots furnished by the Secretary of State.
Sec. 20. Section 32-808, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-808 (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 32-939.02,
ballots for early voting to be mailed pursuant to section 32-941 shall be
ready for delivery to registered voters not more than twenty-two at least
thirty-five days prior to each statewide primary or general election and
at least fifteen days prior to all other elections.
(2) The election commissioner or county clerk shall not mail or
issue any ballot for early voting if the election to which such ballot
pertains has already been held.
(3) The election commissioner or county clerk shall publish in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county an application form to be
used by registered voters in making an application for a ballot for early
voting after the ballots become available. The application form shall
include the reasons a voter is permitted to apply for a ballot for early
voting pursuant to section 32-938. The publication of the application
shall not be required if the election is held by mail pursuant to
sections 32-952 to 32-959.
Sec. 21. Section 32-902, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-902 (1) The election commissioner or county clerk shall cause
instructions for the guidance of registered voters in preparing their
ballots to be printed in large, clear type on cards in English. He or she
shall furnish at least five such cards to each polling place in each
precinct at the same time and in the same manner as the printed ballots.
-19-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
The judges or clerks of election shall post such cards in each voting
booth on the day of election. The card shall contain full instructions on
preparing and casting ballots, including how to cast a write-in vote. The
form and contents of the cards shall be approved by the Secretary of
State.
(2) The election commissioner or county clerk shall cause voting
information to be posted in each polling place on the day of election.
The voting information shall include the following information as
approved by the Secretary of State:
(a) Information regarding the date of the election and the hours
during which polling places will be open;
(b) Instructions for voters who registered to vote pursuant to
section 32-304 or by mail and first-time voters;
(c) General information on voting rights under applicable federal
and state laws, including information on the right of an individual to
cast a provisional ballot and instructions on how to contact the
appropriate officials if these rights are alleged to have been violated;
and
(d) General information on federal and state laws regarding
prohibitions on acts of fraud and misrepresentation.
Sec. 22. Section 32-938, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-938 (1) For elections that are not conducted by mail pursuant to
sections 32-952 to 32-960, a A registered voter shall be permitted to
vote early by requesting a ballot for early voting pursuant to section
32-941 or 32-943 for any one of the following reasons: .
(a) The registered voter expects to be absent from his or her county
at the time the election is to be held;
(b) The registered voter will be eighty years of age or older on the
day of the election;
(c) The registered voter is physically unable to go to the polling
-20-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
place;
(d) The registered voter will be unable to go to the polling place
on the day of the election due to his or her hospitalization for medical
or surgical treatment;
(e) The registered voter will be unable to go to the polling place
on the day of the election because the voter is the caretaker of a person
who is hospitalized, ill, or disabled;
(f) The registered voter cannot go to the polling place on the day
of the election because of the tenets of his or her religion;
(g) The registered voter will be unable to go to the polling place
on the day of the election because he or she is confined by public order
under the laws of (i) this state, (ii) any other state or territory of
the United States or the District of Columbia, or (iii) the United
States;
(h) The registered voter is legally blind;
(i) The registered voter has requested that his or her residence
address remain confidential under section 32-331;
(j) The registered voter may be unable to vote in person due to jury
duty; or
(k) The registered voter is a Nebraska resident and (i) a member of
the armed forces of the United States or a spouse or dependent of such
member, (ii) a citizen temporarily residing outside the United States or
of the District of Columbia, or (iii) and overseas citizen.
(2) Any person excluded from voting under section 32-313 or 32-314
shall not be allowed to receive a ballot for early voting.
(3) Any person who fails to register to vote by the voter
registration deadline shall not be allowed to vote except as provided in
section 32-940 or 32-941.
Sec. 23. Section 32-941, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-941 (1) Any registered voter who is permitted to vote early
-21-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
pursuant to section 32-938 and who has presented valid photographic
identification to the election commissioner or county clerk may, not more
than one hundred twenty days before any election and not later than the
close of business on the second Friday preceding the election, request a
ballot for the election to be mailed to a specific address at which the
voter has access to mail. A registered voter shall request a ballot in
writing to the election commissioner or county clerk in the county where
the registered voter has established his or her home, shall indicate his
or her residence address, the address to which the ballot is to be mailed
if different, and his or her telephone number if available, and the
reason the voter is requesting the ballot as permitted in section 32-938,
and shall include:
(a) The identification number of the voter's driver's license or
state identification card issued by the State of Nebraska;
(b) A photocopy of any other valid photographic identification
issued to or related to the voter; or
(c) The voter's reasonable impediment certification.
(2) If the identification number of the voter's driver's license or
state identification card issued by the State of Nebraska is provided,
the election commissioner or county clerk shall verify the driver's
license or state identification card data with the information provided
by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to section 32-308.
(3) If such identification or certification is not provided or
cannot be verified, the election commissioner or county clerk shall
contact the voter and inform the voter that the ballot will not be issued
until the voter provides the identification or certification required
under this section.
(4) The registered voter may use the form published by the election
commissioner or county clerk pursuant to section 32-808. The registered
voter shall sign the request. A registered voter may use a facsimile
machine or electronic mail for the submission of a request for a ballot.
-22-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
(5) The election commissioner or county clerk shall include a
registration application with the ballots if the person is not
registered. Registration applications shall not be mailed after the third
Friday preceding the election. If the person is not registered to vote,
the registration application shall be returned not later than the closing
of the polls on the day of the election. No ballot issued under this
section shall be counted unless such registration application is properly
completed and processed.
(5) (6) Subdivisions (1)(a) through (c) of this section do not apply
to any voter who casts a ballot pursuant to section 32-939.02 or
32-939.03.
Sec. 24. Section 32-942, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-942 (1)(a) A registered voter of this state who anticipates being
absent from the county of his or her residence on the day of any election
may appear in person before the election commissioner or county clerk not
more than thirty days prior to the day of election for a statewide
primary or general election, and not more than fifteen days prior to the
election for all other elections, present valid photographic
identification, and obtain his or her ballot unless otherwise entitled to
vote in the office under section 32-915.03. The registered voter shall
vote the ballot in the office of the election commissioner or county
clerk or shall return the ballot to the office not later than the closing
of the polls on the day of the election.
(b) A registered voter who is present in the county on the day of
the election and who chooses to vote on the day of the election shall
vote at the polling place assigned to the precinct in which he or she
resides unless he or she is returning a ballot for early voting or voting
pursuant to section 32-943.
(2) If a person registers to vote and requests a ballot at the same
time under this section, he or she shall, in addition to the requirements
-23-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
of subsection (1) of this section, (a)(i) present one of the address
confirmation documents as prescribed in subdivision (1)(a) of section
32-318.01, (ii) present proof that he or she is a member of the armed
forces of the United States who by reason of active duty has been absent
from his or her place of residence where the member is otherwise eligible
to vote, is a member of the United States Merchant Marine who by reason
of service has been away from his or her place of residence where the
member is otherwise eligible to vote, is a spouse or dependent of a
member of the armed forces of the United States or United States Merchant
Marine who has been absent from his or her place of residence due to the
service of that member, or resides outside the United States and but for
such residence would be qualified to vote in the state if the state was
the last place in which the person was domiciled before leaving the
United States, or (iii) state that he or she is elderly or handicapped
and has requested to vote by alternative means other than by casting a
ballot at his or her polling place on election day or (b) vote a ballot
which is placed in an envelope with the voter's name and address and
other necessary identifying information and kept securely for counting as
provided in this subsection. This subsection does not extend the deadline
for voter registration specified in section 32-302. A ballot cast
pursuant to subdivision (b) of this subsection shall be rejected and
shall not be counted if the acknowledgment of registration sent to the
registrant pursuant to section 32-322 is returned as undeliverable for a
reason other than clerical error within ten days after it is mailed,
otherwise after such ten-day period, the ballot shall be counted.
(3) This section applies only to a person who appears in person to
obtain a ballot as provided in subsection (1) of this section and does
not apply to a ballot mailed to a voter pursuant to section 32-945.
Sec. 25. Section 32-943, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-943 (1) Any registered voter who is permitted to vote early
-24-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
pursuant to section 32-938 and who has presented valid photographic
identification to the election commissioner or county clerk may appoint
an agent to (a) submit a request for a ballot for early voting on his or
her behalf of such voter or (b) return a ballot to the election
commissioner or county clerk on behalf of such voter. The registered
voter or his or her agent may request that the ballot be sent to the
registered voter by mail or indicate on the request that the agent will
personally pick up the ballot for such registered voter from the office
of the election commissioner or county clerk.
(2) A registered voter or an agent acting on behalf of a registered
voter shall request a ballot in writing to the election commissioner or
county clerk in the county where the registered voter has established his
or her residence, shall indicate the voter's residence address, the
address to which the ballot is to be mailed if different, and the voter's
telephone number if available and precinct if known, and shall:
(a) Present a valid photographic identification of the voter; or
(b) Include, with the request:
(i) The identification number of the voter's driver's license or
state identification card issued by the State of Nebraska;
(ii) A photocopy of valid photographic identification issued to or
related to the voter; or
(iii) The voter's reasonable impediment certification. The
certification shall be verified pursuant to section 32-1002.01.
(3) (2) The registered voter or the voter's agent may use the form
published by the election commissioner or county clerk pursuant to
section 32-808. The registered voter or his or her agent shall sign the
request.
(4) (3) A candidate for office at such election and any person
serving on a campaign committee for such a candidate shall not act as an
agent for any registered voter requesting a ballot pursuant to this
section unless such person is a member of the registered voter's family.
-25-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
The employer of a registered voter shall not act as an agent for the
registered voter requesting a ballot pursuant to this section unless the
employer is a member of the registered voter's family. No agent of such
an employer shall act as an agent pursuant to this section for any
employee of such employer unless the agent is a member of the registered
voter's family. No person shall act as agent for more than two registered
voters in any election.
(5) (4) The agent shall pick up the ballot before one hour prior to
the closing of the polls on election day and deliver the ballot to the
registered voter. The ballot shall be returned not later than the closing
of the polls on the day of the election and shall be returned in an
identification envelope as provided in section 32-947.
(6) (5) The election commissioner or county clerk shall adopt
procedures for the distribution of ballots under this section.
(7) (6) Subdivisions (2)(a) (1)(a) and (b) of this section do not
apply to any voter who casts a ballot pursuant to section 32-939.02 or
32-939.03.
Sec. 26. Section 32-947, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-947 (1) Upon receipt of an application or other request for a
ballot to vote early, the election commissioner or county clerk shall
determine whether the applicant is a registered voter and is entitled to
vote as requested. If the election commissioner or county clerk
determines that the applicant is a registered voter entitled to vote
early and the application was received not later than the close of
business on the second Friday preceding the election, the election
commissioner or county clerk shall deliver a ballot to the applicant in
person or by nonforwardable first-class mail, postage paid. The election
commissioner or county clerk or any employee of the election commissioner
or county clerk shall write or cause to be affixed his or her customary
signature or initials on the ballot.
-26-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
(2) An unsealed identification envelope shall be delivered with the
ballot, and upon the back of the envelope shall be printed a form
substantially as follows:
VOTER'S OATH
I, the undersigned voter, declare that the enclosed ballot or
ballots contained no voting marks of any kind when I received them, and I
caused the ballot or ballots to be marked, enclosed in the identification
envelope, and sealed in such envelope.
To the best of my knowledge and belief, I declare under penalty of
election falsification that:
(a) I, .................., am a registered voter
in .................. County;
(b) I reside in the State of Nebraska at ..................;
(c) I have voted the enclosed ballot and am returning it in
compliance with Nebraska law; and
(d) I have not voted and will not vote in this election except by
this ballot; and .
(e) I am permitted to apply for a ballot to vote early for the
following reason:
(Applicant must check the true statement concerning his or her
reason for voting a ballot for early voting.)
. . . I will be absent from the county at the time of the election.
. . . I will be eighty years of age or older on the date of the
election.
. . . I am physically unable to go to the polling place.
. . . I will be unable to go to the polling place on the day of
election because of hospitalization.
. . . I will be unable to go to the polling place on the day of the
election because I am the caretaker of a person who is hospitalized, ill,
or disabled.
. . . I cannot go to the polling place on the day of the election
-27-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
because of the tenets of my religion.
. . . I will be unable to go to the polling place on the day of the
election because of confinement by public order.
. . . I am legally blind.
. . . I have requested that my residence address remain confidential
pursuant to law.
. . . I may be unable to vote in person due to jury duty.
. . . I am a Nebraska resident and (i) a member of the armed forces
of the United States or a spouse or dependent of such member, (ii) a
citizen temporarily residing outside the United States or of the District
of Columbia, or (iii) an overseas citizen.
ANY PERSON WHO SIGNS THIS FORM KNOWING THAT ANY OF THE INFORMATION
IN THE FORM IS FALSE SHALL BE GUILTY OF ELECTION FALSIFICATION, A CLASS
IV FELONY UNDER SECTION 32-1502 OF THE STATUTES OF NEBRASKA. THE PENALTY
FOR ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS IMPRISONMENT FOR UP TO TWO YEARS AND TWELVE
MONTHS POST-RELEASE SUPERVISION OR A FINE NOT TO EXCEED TEN THOUSAND
DOLLARS, OR BOTH.
I also understand that failure to sign below will invalidate my
ballot.
Signature ........................................
(3) If the ballot and identification envelope will be returned by
mail or by someone other than the voter, the election commissioner or
county clerk shall include with the ballot an identification envelope
upon the face of which shall be printed the official title and post
office address of the election commissioner or county clerk.
(4) The election commissioner or county clerk shall also enclose
with the ballot materials:
(a) A registration application, if the election commissioner or
county clerk has determined that the applicant is not a registered voter
pursuant to section 32-945, with instructions that failure to return the
completed and signed application indicating the residence address as it
-28-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
appears on the voter's request for a ballot to the election commissioner
or county clerk by the close of the polls on election day will result in
the ballot not being counted;
(b) A registration application and the oath pursuant to section
32-946, if the voter is without a residence address, with instructions
that the residence address of the voter shall be deemed that of the
office of the election commissioner or county clerk of the county of the
voter's prior residence and that failure to return the completed and
signed application and oath to the election commissioner or county clerk
by the close of the polls on election day will result in the ballot not
being counted; or
(c) Written instructions directing the voter to submit a copy of an
identification document pursuant to section 32-318.01 if the voter is
required to present identification under such section and advising the
voter that failure to submit identification to the election commissioner
or county clerk by the close of the polls on election day will result in
the ballot not being counted.
(5) The election commissioner or county clerk may enclose with the
ballot materials a separate return envelope for the voter's use in
returning his or her identification envelope containing the voted ballot,
registration application, and other materials that may be required.
Sec. 27. Section 32-950.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-950.01 (1) If an election commissioner or county clerk maintains
a secure ballot drop-box for voters to deposit completed ballots, the
election commissioner or county clerk shall ensure that the secure ballot
drop-box:
(a) Is conspicuously marked as a secure ballot drop-off location and
placed in a well-lit and easily accessible location;
(b) Is under video surveillance at all times;
(c) (a) Is securely fastened to the ground or a concrete slab
-29-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
connected to the ground;
(d) (b) Is tamper-resistant and secured by a lock that can only be
opened by the election commissioner or county clerk or by an election
official designated by the election commissioner or county clerk; and
(e) (c) Complies with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of
1990 and is accessible as determined by the election commissioner or
county clerk.
(2) The election commissioner or county clerk shall inform the
Secretary of State of each secure ballot drop-box's location no later
than forty-two days prior to any statewide primary or general election.
(3)(a) The election commissioner or county clerk or an election
official designated by the election commissioner or county clerk shall
examine each secure ballot drop-box at least thirty days prior to each
election for which the drop-box will be accessible to make sure:
(i) The mechanism for depositing ballots is working correctly;
(ii) The drop-box interior is clean and in good condition; and
(iii) The drop-box exterior and signage are clean and in good
condition, both physically and cosmetically.
(b) Any person who examines a secure ballot drop-box shall notify
the election commissioner or county clerk regarding concerns or defects,
and the election commissioner or county clerk shall immediately provide
for repairs or resolution. Repairs shall be completed no later than the
sixth Friday prior to any statewide primary or general election and no
later than the fourth Friday prior to any special election.
(4) The election commissioner or county clerk shall post a sign on
or near each secure ballot drop-box indicating that the drop-box is under
twenty-four-hour video surveillance.
(5) (3) Except for a secure ballot drop-box for an election
conducted under section 32-960, the election commissioner or county clerk
or an election official designated by the election commissioner or county
clerk shall open each secure ballot drop-box no later than the sixth
-30-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
Friday prior to any statewide primary or general election and no later
than the fourth Friday prior to any special election. For any statewide
primary or general election, each secure ballot drop-box shall remain
accessible to voters until the deadline for the receipt of ballots as
provided in section 32-908. For any special election, at least one secure
ballot drop-box shall remain accessible to voters until the deadline for
the receipt of ballots as provided in section 32-954.
(6) (4) After a secure ballot drop-box is made available for
depositing ballots, the election commissioner or county clerk shall
ensure that ballots deposited in such secure ballot drop-box are
collected and returned to the office of the election commissioner or
county clerk at least once during each business day.
(7) Immediately upon the deadline for receipt of ballots, the
election commissioner or county clerk or an election official designated
by the election commissioner or county clerk shall (a) close each secure
ballot drop-box in such a way that ballots may not be deposited after
such deadline for deposit has passed and (b) cause the drop-box to remain
closed until the next election at which it will be used.
(8) The election commissioner or county clerk shall install a video
recording device for each secure ballot drop-box. The recordings shall
capture the location of such drop-box and evidence the date and time of
each such recording beginning on the thirtieth day preceding an election
until the last retrieval of ballots from such drop-box at the close of
the polls at such election. Each such recording shall immediately be made
publicly available from the date of recording, but in no case later than
five days after such last retrieval of ballots, without the necessity of
a subpoena or other legal proceedings. The election commissioner or
county clerk shall retain each such recording for a period of twenty-two
months and may destroy the recording at the end of such period, except
that such period may be extended as necessary in response to a pending
investigation, an order of the Secretary of State, or an order of a court
-31-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
of competent jurisdiction.
Sec. 28. Section 32-960, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-960 (1) In any county with a population of less than ten thousand
inhabitants, the county clerk may apply to the Secretary of State to mail
ballots for all elections held after approval of the application to
registered voters of any or all of the precincts in the county. The
application shall include a written plan for the conduct of the election
which complies with this section, including a timetable for the conduct
of the election and provisions for the notice of election to be published
and for the application for ballots for early voting notwithstanding
other statutory provisions regarding the content and publication of a
notice of election or the application for ballots for early voting. If
the Secretary of State approves such application for one or more
precincts in the county, the county clerk shall follow the applicable
procedures in sections 32-953 to 32-959 for conducting elections by mail,
except that the deadline for receipt of the ballots shall be the deadline
specified in subsection (2) of section 32-908.
(2) The county clerk of a county that has an approved application
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Shall allow a voter to return the ballot by hand-delivering it
to the office of the county clerk;
(b) Shall maintain at least one secure ballot drop-box available for
voters to deposit completed ballots twenty-four hours per day, starting
at least ten days before the election through the deadline provided in
subsection (1) of this section for the receipt of ballots;
(c) Shall maintain at least one in-person voting location at the
office of the county clerk at which a voter in a precinct subject to a
plan under this section approved by the Secretary of State may receive
and cast a ballot which shall be open on the day of the election from the
time for opening the polls pursuant to section 32-908 through the
-32-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
deadline provided in subsection (1) of this section for the receipt of
ballots;
(d) Shall maintain in-person early voting opportunities as described
in section 32-942; and
(e) May provide additional secure ballot drop-boxes and in-person
voting locations in addition that need not be open according to the
requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) of this subsection.
Sec. 29. Section 32-1002, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-1002 (1) As the ballots are removed from the ballot box pursuant
to sections 32-1012 to 32-1018, the receiving board shall separate the
envelopes containing the provisional ballots from the rest of the ballots
and deliver them to the election commissioner or county clerk.
(2) Upon receipt of a provisional ballot, the election commissioner
or county clerk shall verify that the certificate on the front of the
envelope or the form attached to the envelope is in proper form and that
the certification has been signed by the voter.
(3) The election commissioner or county clerk shall also (a) verify
that such person has not voted anywhere else in the county or been issued
a ballot for early voting, (b) investigate whether any credible evidence
exists that the person was properly registered to vote in the county
before the deadline for registration for the election, (c) investigate
whether any information has been received pursuant to section 32-308,
32-309, 32-310, or 32-324 that the person has resided, registered, or
voted in any other county or state since registering to vote in the
county, and (d) upon determining that credible evidence exists that the
person was properly registered to vote in the county, make the
appropriate changes to the voter registration register by entering the
information contained in the registration application completed by the
voter at the time of voting a provisional ballot.
(4) A provisional ballot cast by a voter pursuant to section 32-915
-33-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
shall be counted if:
(a) Credible evidence exists that the voter was properly registered
in the county before the deadline for registration for the election;
(b) The voter has resided in the county continuously since
registering to vote in the county;
(c) The voter has not voted anywhere else in the county or has not
otherwise voted early using a ballot for early voting;
(d) The voter has completed a registration application prior to
voting as prescribed in subsection (6) of this section and:
(i) The residence address provided on the registration application
completed pursuant to subdivision (1)(e) of section 32-915 is located
within the precinct in which the person voted; and
(ii) If the voter is voting in a primary election, the party
affiliation provided on the registration application completed prior to
voting the provisional ballot is the same party affiliation that appears
on the voter's voter registration record based on his or her previous
registration application; and
(e) The certification on the front of the envelope or form attached
to the envelope is in the proper form and signed by the voter.
(5) A provisional ballot cast by a voter pursuant to section 32-915
shall not be counted if:
(a) The voter was not properly registered in the county before the
deadline for registration for the election;
(b) Information has been received pursuant to section 32-308,
32-309, 32-310, or 32-324 that the voter has resided, registered, or
voted in any other county or state since registering to vote in the
county in which he or she cast the provisional ballot;
(c) Credible evidence exists that the voter has voted elsewhere or
has otherwise voted early;
(d) The voter failed to complete and sign a registration application
pursuant to subsection (6) of this section and subdivision (1)(e) of
-34-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
section 32-915;
(e) The residence address provided on the registration application
completed pursuant to subdivision (1)(e) of section 32-915 is in a
different county or in a different precinct than the county or precinct
in which the voter voted;
(f) If the voter is voting in a primary election, the party
affiliation on the registration application completed prior to voting the
provisional ballot is different than the party affiliation that appears
on the voter's voter registration record based on his or her previous
registration application; or
(g) The voter failed to complete and sign the certification on the
envelope or form attached to the envelope pursuant to subsection (3) of
section 32-915.
(6) An error or omission of information on the registration
application or the certification required under section 32-915 shall not
result in the provisional ballot not being counted if:
(a)(i) The errant or omitted information is contained elsewhere on
the registration application or certification; or
(ii) The information is not necessary to determine the eligibility
of the voter to cast a ballot; and
(b) Both the registration application and the certification are
signed by the voter.
(7) Upon determining that the voter's provisional ballot is eligible
to be counted, the election commissioner or county clerk shall remove the
ballot from the envelope without exposing the marks on the ballot and
shall place the ballot with the ballots to be counted by the county
canvassing board.
(8) The election commissioner or county clerk shall notify the
system administrator of the system created pursuant to section 32-202 as
to whether the ballot was counted and, if not, the reason the ballot was
not counted.
-35-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
(9) The verification and investigation shall be completed within
seven business days after the election.
Sec. 30. (1) A hand count shall include only the actual voted paper
ballots, physically marked by the actual voter or pursuant to section
32-1016, and not the voter's choices reproduced via any electronic device
or equipment, including, but not limited to, printers, except that any
ballot voted by a person with disabilities using a machine to assist in
marking the ballot shall be included in the hand count.
(2) A hand count shall also include providing for (a) verification
of the covert watermark and (b) the comparison and verification of the
signature on the envelope holding a ballot for early voting with the
signature on file with the election commissioner or county clerk for the
respective voter who requested the ballot for early voting.
Sec. 31. Section 32-1041, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-1041 (1) The election commissioner or county clerk may use
optical-scan ballots or voting systems approved by the Secretary of State
to allow registered voters to cast their votes at any election. The
election commissioner or county clerk may (a) conduct a hand count or (b)
use vote counting devices and voting systems approved as provided in
subsection (3) of this section by the Secretary of State for tabulating
the votes cast at any election. Vote counting devices shall include
electronic counting devices such as optical scanners.
(2) No electronic voting system shall be used under the Election
Act.
(3) The election commissioner or county clerk shall only use a Any
new voting or counting system that is shall be approved prior to each
statewide primary election by the Secretary of State, each election
commissioner appointed by the Governor, one election commissioner chosen
by rotation from each congressional district from the remaining counties
that have a separate office of election commissioner, one county clerk
-36-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
chosen by rotation from each congressional district from a county in
which the county clerk also serves as the election commissioner, and an
independent information technology company that is qualified to assess
such system and that is not associated with any political party or the
vendor of the system prior to use by an election commissioner or county
clerk. The Secretary of State may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to establish different procedures and locations for voting
and counting votes pursuant to the use of the any new voting or counting
system. The procedures shall be designed to preserve the secrecy, safety,
and confidentiality of each vote cast and the secrecy and security and
transparency of the counting process, to establish security provisions
for the prevention of fraud and the prevention of interference by
malicious actors, and to ensure that the election is conducted in a fair
manner.
Sec. 32. Section 32-1049, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-1049 Any election commissioner or county clerk using a vote
counting device to count ballots in a centralized location shall:
(1) Provide for the proper sealing of the containers and the
security of the ballots when transported from each polling place to the
centralized location and when removed from their containers and delivered
to the personnel who operate the vote counting devices;
(2) Provide a process of counting which allows for the ballots of
each precinct to be placed in a sealed container and placed in a secure
location after the counting process has been completed;
(3) Provide for a method of overseeing the ballots that have been
overvoted or damaged which does not involve judging voter intent to
assure that these ballots have not been or will not be intentionally
mismarked;
(4) Provide for a procedure for counting write-in votes when such
votes and names of write-in candidates are to be counted and recorded;
-37-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
(5) Provide for at least three independent tests to be conducted
before counting begins to verify the accuracy of the counting process,
which includes the computerized program installed for counting various
ballots by vote counting devices, by (a) the election commissioner or
county clerk, (b) the chief deputy election commissioner or a registered
voter with a different party affiliation than that of the election
commissioner or county clerk, and (c) the person who installed the
program in the vote counting device or the person in charge of operating
the device;
(6) Provide for storing and safeguarding the magnetic tapes or
computer chips of the vote counting devices for the required period of
time;
(7) Provide the appropriate security personnel or measures necessary
to safeguard the secrecy and security of the counting process;
(8) Develop a procedure for picking up and counting ballots during
election day at the discretion of the election commissioner or county
clerk. No report or tabulation of vote totals for such ballots shall be
produced or generated prior to one hour before the closing of the polls;
(9) Develop a procedure for picking up and transporting ballots from
a secure ballot drop-box to the office of the election commissioner or
county clerk; and
(10) Submit a written plan to the Secretary of State specifically
outlining the procedures that will be followed on election day to
implement this section. The plan shall be submitted no later than twenty-
five days before the election and shall be modified, as necessary, for
each primary, general, or special election; and .
(11) Provide for a procedure to hand count at least twenty-five
percent of the ballots at each election to verify the tabulation of votes
by the vote counting devices.
Sec. 33. Section 32-1118, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-38-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
32-1118 (1) The apparent loser at a general election for a seat in
the Legislature may secure a recount of the ballots cast at such election
by filing a petition for a recount in duplicate with the Secretary of
State no later than the fourth Monday after the election. The petition
shall be accompanied by a corporate surety bond in the penal sum of two
thousand five hundred dollars conditioned for the payment of costs
pursuant to section 32-1116 if the recount fails to change the results of
the election. If at any stage of the recount the amount of the bond
becomes inadequate, the Secretary of State may order an increase in the
amount of such bond. The petition shall specify if a hand count is
requested by the person filing the petition.
(2) The Secretary of State shall, by certified or registered mail,
give notice of the filing of a petition under this section not later than
the day following the filing of the petition and deliver a copy of the
petition to the declared winner. The Secretary of State shall also, by
the most practicable means of communication, direct the election
commissioner or county clerk of each county involved to deliver the
ballot boxes to the office of the election commissioner or county clerk
designated by the Secretary of State no later than the following Monday.
(3) After the ballot boxes have been received at the designated
office, they shall be opened and the ballots for member of the
Legislature shall be recounted under the supervision of the Secretary of
State. The Secretary of State may employ such persons as may be necessary
to conduct the recount and fix their compensation. If a hand count is
requested pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the recount shall
be conducted by hand count.
(4) The Secretary of State shall, on or before December 20, certify
the results of the recount to each of the parties to the recount and to
the Clerk of the Legislature.
Sec. 34. Section 32-1119, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-39-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
32-1119 (1) If it appears as evidenced by the abstract of votes that
any candidate failed to be nominated or elected by a margin of (a) one
percent or less of the votes received by the candidate who received the
highest number of votes for the office at an election in which more than
five hundred total votes were cast or (b) two percent or less of the
votes received by the candidate who received the highest number of votes
for the office at an election in which five hundred or less total votes
were cast, then such candidate shall be entitled to a recount. Any losing
candidate may waive the his or her right to a recount by filing a written
statement with the Secretary of State, election commissioner, or county
clerk with whom such candidate he or she made his or her filing. All
expenses of a recount under this section shall be paid by those political
subdivisions involved in the recount.
(2) Recounts shall be made by the county canvassing board which
officiated in making the official county canvass of the election returns.
If any member of the county canvassing board cannot participate in the
recount, another person shall be appointed by the election commissioner
or county clerk to take the member's place.
(3) Recounts for candidates who filed with the Secretary of State
shall be made on the fifth Wednesday after the election and shall
commence at 9 a.m. The Secretary of State shall inform each election
commissioner or county clerk of the names of the candidates for which the
board of state canvassers deems a recount to be necessary.
(4) The election commissioner or county clerk shall be responsible
for recounting the ballots for those candidates for whom the county
canvassing board deems a recount to be necessary. The recount shall be
made as soon as possible after the adjournment of the county canvassing
board, except that if a recount is required under subsection (3) of this
section, the recounts may be conducted concurrently.
(5) The Secretary of State, election commissioner, or county clerk
shall notify all candidates whose ballots will be recounted of the time,
-40-

LB541 LB541
2025 2025
date, and place of the recount. Candidates whose ballots will be
recounted may be present or be represented by an agent appointed by the
candidate.
(6) The procedures for the recounting of ballots shall be the same
as those used for the counting of ballots on election day, except that
any election commissioner or county clerk shall have the option to
recount the ballots manually by hand count. The recount shall be
conducted at the county courthouse, except that if vote counting devices
are used for the counting or recounting, such counting or recounting may
be accomplished at the site of the devices. Counties counting ballots by
using a vote counting device shall first recount the ballots by use of
the device. If substantial changes are found, the ballots shall then be
counted using such device in any precinct which might reflect a
substantial change.
Sec. 35. Original sections 32-306, 32-307, 32-310, 32-311.01,
32-312.05, 32-315, 32-320, 32-321, 32-323, 32-325, 32-806, 32-808,
32-902, 32-938, 32-1118, and 32-1119, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 32-101, 32-103, 32-202, 32-203, 32-206, 32-308,
32-312, 32-941, 32-942, 32-943, 32-947, 32-950.01, 32-960, 32-1002,
32-1041, and 32-1049, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
Sec. 36. The following sections are outright repealed: Section
32-309, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 32-304 and
32-320.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024.
-41-